Utah statutes.
67-4-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Federal funds" means cash received from the United States government or
from other individuals or entities for or on behalf of the United States and
deposited with the state treasurer or any agency of the state.
(2)  "General Fund" means money received into the treasury and not specially
appropriated to any other fund.
(3)  "Maintain custody" means to direct the safekeeping and investment of
state funds.
(4) (a)  "State entity" means each department, commission, board, council,
agency, institution, officer, corporation, fund, division, office, committee,
authority, laboratory, library, unit, bureau, panel, or other administrative
unit of the state.
(b)  "State entity" includes independent state agencies and public
corporations.
(5) (a)  "State funds" means funds that are owned, held, or administered by a
state entity, regardless of the source of the funds.
(b)  "State funds" includes funds of independent state agencies or public
corporations, regardless of the source of funds.
(c)  "State funds" does not include funds held by the Utah State Retirement
Board or the Workers' Compensation Fund.
(6)  "Warrant" means an order in a specific amount drawn upon the treasurer by
the Division of Finance or another state agency.
